Utah statutes.
70A-2-504.   Shipment by seller.
(1)  Where the seller is required or authorized to send the goods to the buyer
and the contract does not require him to deliver them at a particular
destination, then unless otherwise agreed he must:
(a)  put the goods in the possession of such a carrier and make such a
contract for their transportation as may be reasonable having regard to the
nature of the goods and other circumstances of the case;
(b)  obtain and promptly deliver or tender in due form any document necessary
to enable the buyer to obtain possession of the goods or otherwise required by
the agreement or by usage of trade; and
(c)  promptly notify the buyer of the shipment.
(2)  Failure to notify the buyer under Subsection (1)(c) or to make a proper
contract under Subsection (1)(a) is a ground for rejection only if material
delay or loss ensues.
